Hawaii statutes.
[§412:13-225] Reports. (a) Each
foreign bank that is licensed to establish and maintain a Hawaii state branch,
Hawaii state agency, or Hawaii representative office shall file with the
commissioner any reports the commissioner may require.

(b) Each report filed with the commissioner
under this article, or under any rule or order issued under this article, shall
be in a form and contain any information, shall be signed in a manner, and
shall be verified in a manner, as the commissioner may require. [L 1996, c 155,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next